Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1302.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [62Q.452] CANCER; CLINICAL GENETIC TESTING AND IMAGING. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Clinical genetic testing" means germline multigene testing for an inherited mutation associated with an increased risk of cancer performed in accordance with evidence-based clinical practice guidelines. new text end new text begin (c) "Imaging" means evidence-based cancer imaging modalities performed in accordance with the most recent version of the National Comprehensive Cancer Network (NCCN) clinical practice guidelines. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Coverage. new text end new text begin (a) A health plan must include coverage for: new text end new text begin (1) imaging for enrollees with an increased risk of cancer, as determined by the NCCN; and new text end new text begin (2) clinical genetic testing for an inherited gene mutation that is recommended by a health care provider for enrollees with a personal or family history of cancer. new text end new text begin (b) The coverage required by this section is not subject to cost-sharing, including but not limited to deductible, co-payment, or coinsurance. new text end new text begin (c) A health plan must not impose any quantity limitation on the coverage under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Application. new text end new text begin If the application of subdivision 2, paragraph (b), before an enrollee has met the enrollee's health plan's deductible would result in: (1) health savings account ineligibility under United States Code, title 26, section 223; or (2) catastrophic health plan ineligibility under United States Code, title 42, section 18022(e), then subdivision 2, paragraph (b), applies to imaging and clinical genetic testing only after the enrollee has met the enrollee's health plan's deductible. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027, and applies to health plans offered, issued, or renewed on or after that date. new text end